Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GITCHI GAMI STATE TRAIL.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the development of three segments of the Gitchi Gami State Trail. This appropriation is to construct a multiuse paved trail between Arrowhead Electric and Steam Engine Road in the city of Lutsen; to construct a multiuse paved trail between Superior Shores Road and Flood Bay State Wayside, including a bridge over coastal wetland and improvements to the trailhead and wayside at Flood Bay State Wayside; and to predesign and design a trail segment between Flood Bay State Wayside to Stewart River. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end